Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB807.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 292.420 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In any proceeding under this chapter, the burden of proving an exemption or an
exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.
(2) (a) The commissioner may require any person, who is selling or offering for sale
or who is about to sell or offer for sale or who has sold or offered for sale any
security within this state, to file a statement of the claim of exemption, if any,
upon which the[such] person is relying, and if any time, in the opinion of the
commissioner, the information contained in the[such] statement filed is
misleading, incorrect, inadequate, or fails to establish the right of exemption,
the commissioner may require the[such] person, agent, or investment adviser
to file the[such] information as may in his or her opinion be necessary to
establish the claimed exemption.
(b) The refusal to furnish information as required by order of the commissioner
pursuant to the provisions of this subsection, within a reasonable time to be
fixed by the commissioner, shall be proper ground for the entry of an order by
the commissioner suspending or[and/or] canceling the registration of the
broker-dealer, agent, or investment adviser.
(3) (a) The commissioner shall have authority at all times to consider and determine
whether any proposed sale, transaction, issue, or security is entitled to an
exemption or an exception from the definition accorded by this chapter,
except[provided, however,] that the commissioner in his or her discretion may
decline to exercise his or her[such] authority as to any proposed sale,
transaction, issue, or security.
(b) Any interested party desiring the commissioner to exercise his or her[such]
authority shall submit to the commissioner a verified statement of all material
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2234
facts relating to the proposed sale, transaction, issue, or security, which
verified statement shall be accompanied by a request for a ruling as to the
particular exemption or exception from definition, together with a filing fee of
two hundred fifty dollars ($250).
(c) After any[such] notice to interested parties as the commissioner shall deem
proper and after a hearing, if any, the commissioner may enter an order
finding the proposed sale, transaction, issue, or security entitled or not entitled
to the exemption or the exception from definition as claimed.
(d) An order so entered, unless an appeal be taken therefrom in the manner
prescribed in this chapter, shall be binding upon the commissioner, provided
that the proposed sale, transaction, issue, or security when consummated or
issued conforms in every relevant and material particular with the facts as set
forth in the verified statement as submitted.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/18/2026 3:56 PM Jacketed